Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-814.02
Search warrant; issuance on oral statement; procedure.

In lieu of, or in addition to, written affidavit, a search warrant may be issued under section 29-814.04 pursuant to an oral statement given in person and under oath to a magistrate or judge. The oral statement shall be taken by means of a voice recording device in the custody of the magistrate or judge. If no voice recording device is available, the statement may be taken stenographically. The magistrate or judge shall direct that the recorded or stenographic statement be transcribed and the magistrate or judge shall certify the accuracy of the transcription. The magistrate or judge shall file with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the property was seized the original of the record and the transcribed statement. Such filing shall be made at the same time the warrant, copy of the return, inventory, and all other papers connected with the warrant are filed pursuant to section 29-816. For purposes of sections 29-814.01 to 29-814.06, an oral statement authorized by this section shall be considered to be an affidavit.

Laws 1980, LB 731, § 2.

Where the judge incorporated an officer's oral statement into the officer's affidavit by interlineation, there was no need to comply with this section. State v. Nelson, 6 Neb. App. 519, 574 N.W.2d 770 (1998).